Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 4 Alcoholic Beverages Generally — Permits
Subchapter 10

— Restaurant Beer and Wine Permit

Effective Dates.

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 763, § 6: Apr. 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that Act 294 of 2009 became effective, by emergency clause, on March 3, 2009, and that it has been found that there are some technical corrections that need to be placed into immediate operation. It is further determined that these technical corrections are necessary to give full force and effect to the provisions of Act 294 of 2009 and that if this technical corrections bill is not passed with an emergency clause then unnecessary confusion concerning the provisions of Act 294 of 2009 may arise. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-4-1001. Creation — Issuance — Expiration.

(a)(1)

In addition to all other existing alcoholic beverage permits authorized to be issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for the retail sale of alcoholic beverages, there is created a restaurant beer and wine permit, which authorizes the sale of beer, hard cider, and wine as defined in §3-9-301(7) at restaurants as defined in §3-9-301(6).

(2)

The restaurant beer and wine permit is not subject to any quota restrictions.

(b)

The permit may be issued by the division to a qualified person.

(c)

Each restaurant beer and wine permit shall be issued annually for a fee of three hundred and fifty dollars ($350) and shall expire on June 30 of each year.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 11; 2009, No. 763, § 3; 2019, No. 691, § 12.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted “light” preceding “beer” in (a)(1), and made minor stylistic and punctuation changes.

The 2019 amendment inserted “hard cider” in (a)(1).

3-4-1002. Rules.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may adopt rules to carry out this subchapter, to establish appropriate application forms, permit forms, and procedures, and to do all other things necessary to implement this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 11.

3-4-1003. Unauthorized sales — Penalties.

An unauthorized sale under the restaurant beer and wine permit created in this subchapter is subject to the same penalties as established for other on-premises retail permits pursuant to this title.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 11.